Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-605
Criminal possession of written instrument forgery devices; penalty.

(1) A person commits criminal possession of written instrument forgery devices when:

(a) He or she makes or possesses with knowledge of its character any plate, die, or other device, apparatus, equipment, or article specifically designed for use in counterfeiting, unlawfully simulating, or otherwise forging written instruments; or

(b) He or she makes or possesses any device, apparatus, equipment, or article capable of or adaptable to a use specified in subdivision (1)(a) of this section, with intent to use it himself or herself, or to aid or permit another to use it, for purposes of forgery; or

(c) Illegally possesses a genuine plate, die, or other device used in the production of written instruments, with intent to deceive or harm.

(2) Criminal possession of written instrument forgery devices is a Class IV felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 127;

Laws 2016, LB1094, § 8.